Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 454 Miscellaneous Civil Practice Provisions

454.010.
Verification necessary when writing denied. [Repealed.]

454.011.
Declaration of public policy on encouragement of dispute resolution through negotiation and settlement.

It is the policy of this Commonwealth to encourage the peaceable resolution of disputes and the early, voluntary settlement of litigation through negotiation and mediation. To the extent it is consistent with other laws, the courts and state governmental agencies are authorized and encouraged to refer disputing parties to mediation before trial or hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 261, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Weiss, Is Inheritance an Entitlement or a Gift? How and Why to Use a Facilitator/Mediator in the Estate Planning Process, Vol. 70, No. 1, January 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

Young and Walker, Building the Ethical Infrastructure to Support Court-Connected Mediation: Kentucky Supreme Court Takes Important Steps, Vol. 70, No. 2, March 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

454.020.
Voter, when exempt from arrest on civil process — Effect of violation.

No sheriff shall execute any civil process of arrest upon any voter attending an election at which he has the right to vote, or in going to or returning from such an election. Execution by a sheriff of any such process contrary to this section is void.

History.

4568.

454.030.
Forcible entry or detainer, how notice served.

If the officer directed to serve notice on the defendant in forcible entry or detainer proceedings cannot find the defendant on the premises mentioned in the writ, he may explain and leave a copy of the notice with any member of the defendant’s family thereon over sixteen (16) years of age, and if no such person is found he may serve the notice by posting a copy thereof in a conspicuous place on the premises and by mailing a copy of the notice to the mailing address of the premises mentioned in the writ by regular mail through the United States Postal Service, postage prepaid. The notice shall state the time and place of meeting of the court.

History.

2294: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 266, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

454.040.
Trespass, joint or several damages for.

In actions of trespass the jury may assess joint or several damages against the defendants. When the jury finds several damages, the judgment shall be in favor of the plaintiff against each defendant for the several damages, without regard to the amount of damages claimed in the petition, and shall include a joint judgment for the costs.

History.

12.

454.050.
Infants, when to be excluded from courtroom.

In any civil action for slander, seduction or breach of promise of marriage, the judge shall exclude from the courtroom, and from the hearing of the testimony and arguments, all infants under the age of sixteen (16) years, except those who are witnesses in the case or kin to one (1) of the parties.

History.

979.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Exclusion of other persons from courtroom. RCr 9.50.

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Closed Courtrooms and the Public’s Right of Access, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

454.060.
Provisions concerning bond required before injunction granted.

If an injunction be granted to stay proceedings upon a levy made under an execution, and the party applying for the injunction desire to discharge the levy, he shall execute a bond to the effect that he will satisfy the execution to the extent to which the injunction may be dissolved, not exceeding the value of the property released; and upon the execution of such bond, and the issuing of the injunction, the levy shall be discharged. If he does not desire to release the levy, he may execute a bond to the effect that, upon a dissolution of the injunction, in whole or in part, he will have the property, or its value, forthcoming and subject to the order of the court; and, upon the execution of such bond, and the issuing of the injunction, the property levied on shall be delivered to him.

If such injunction extends further than the stay of proceedings upon the levy, the party shall give such additional bond as the court, judge or officer granting the injunction may direct.

In all other cases, the court, judge or officer granting the injunction shall, in the order granting it, fix the amount of the bond to be given, and may prescribe its terms. If the terms of the bond be not so prescribed, it shall be to the effect that the party giving it will pay to the party enjoined such damages as he may sustain, if it be finally decided that the injunction ought not to have been granted.

If the injunction be to stay proceedings upon a judgment, the amount of the bond shall be sufficient to cover, with other damages, the sum of money for which judgment was rendered, with five (5) years’ interest thereon, and the rent, hire or value of the use, for two (2) years, of property for which judgment was given; and, in case of personal property, its value also.

History.

C. C. 278: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1980, ch. 188, § 304, effective July 15, 1980.

454.065.
Order of injunction not to issue until bond executed.

The order of injunction shall not be issued by the clerk until a bond, as is required by KRS

454.060

, with good surety of the party obtaining the injunction, shall have been executed in his office.

History.

C. C. 279: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.070.
Acceptance of sureties by clerk.

Sureties in injunction bonds shall be accepted by the clerk under the same responsibilities as in other cases of sureties accepted by him.

History.

C. C. 280: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.075.
Certain judgments not to be enjoined. [Repealed.]

454.080.
Judgment to be enjoined in court rendering — Affidavit.

An injunction to stay proceedings on a judgment shall not be granted, in an action brought by the party seeking the injunction, in any other court than that in which the judgment was rendered. Nor shall such injunction be granted, unless the party applying therefor make affidavit that no injunction has been previously granted to stay the proceedings on such judgment.

History.

C. C. 285: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.085.
Damages if injunction dissolved.

Upon the dissolution, in whole or in part, of an injunction to stay proceedings upon a judgment, the damages shall be assessed by the court; which may hear the evidence and decide in a summary way, or may, at its discretion, cause a jury to be impaneled to find the damages. If the collection, payment or use of money be enjoined, the damages may be any rate percent on the sum released by the dissolution, which, in the discretion of the court, may be proper, not exceeding ten percent. And, if the delivery of property have been delayed by the injunction, the value of the use, hire or rent thereof shall be assessed; judgment shall be rendered against the party who obtained the injunction for the damages assessed; and the assessment shall be conclusive against the surety of such party.

History.

C. C. 295: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.090.
Procedure for confession of judgment.

Any person may personally appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and, with the assent of a person having a cause of action against him, confess judgment therefore; whereupon judgment shall be entered accordingly.

History.

C. C. 381: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.095.
Cause of action to be stated in judgment.

The cause of action shall be briefly stated in the judgment, or in a writing to be filed as pleadings in an action.

History.

C. C. 382: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.100.
Effect of judgment.

Such judgment shall authorize the same proceedings as judgments rendered in actions, and the confession shall operate as a release of errors.

History.

C. C. 383: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.110.
When infant may vacate judgment.

An infant may, within twelve (12) months after attaining the age of eighteen (18) years, show cause against a judgment, unless it be for a tort done by, or for necessaries furnished to, the infant; or unless it be rendered upon a set-off or counterclaim stated in an answer; but the vacation of such judgment shall not affect the title of a bona fide purchaser under it.

History.

C. C. 391: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1974, ch. 386, § 103.

454.125.
Process may issue and bonds may be taken on holidays.

It shall be no objection to any process, writ, summons, affidavit or order for a provisional remedy that it was issued, made or dated on a holiday; nor shall it be an objection to any bond given by or for any party to an action, or taken by an officer in the course of the same, that it was made or dated on any such day.

History.

C. C. 664: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Holidays, KRS

2.110

.

454.130.
When process may be issued and executed on holiday or Sunday. [Repealed.]

454.135.
When defendant exempt from service of process.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

421.180

, the defendant shall have no privilege of exemption from the service of the process on a holiday or Sunday, except from an arrest, by reason of his attendance at any muster, election, or order of survey, or as a witness at any court or other place.

History.

C. C. 666: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1996, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

454.140.
Officers to whom process to be directed — Provisional remedies.

Every process in an action or proceeding shall be directed to the sheriff of the county; or, if he be a party, or be interested, to the coroner; or, if he be interested, to the jailer; or, if all these officers be interested, to any constable.

The summons or an order for a provisional remedy, in an action or proceeding, may, at the request of the party in whose behalf it is issued, be directed to any of the officers named in subsection (1) of this section who is not a party to nor interested in the action.

History.

C. C. 667: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.145.
Court may appoint person to serve particular process.

The court, for good cause, may appoint a person to serve a particular process or order, and he shall have the same power to execute it which a sheriff has. His return must be verified by his affidavit. He shall be entitled to the fees allowed to sheriffs for similar services.

History.

C. C. 668: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.150.
Procedure for restoration of money received by the Commonwealth where judgment rendered upon constructive service is modified or set aside.

When the Commonwealth shall have received money under a judgment rendered upon constructive service, and the defendant did not appear, and such judgment is thereafter modified or set aside under the provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure, upon a retrial, the court in making an order for the restoration of such money, shall direct the proper financial officer of the Commonwealth to draw his warrant upon the Treasurer for the proper amount in favor of the party in whose favor the order of restoration may be made, and it shall thereupon become the duty of such officer to draw his warrant in obedience to such order.

History.

C. C. 414: Acts 1888, ch. 1471, § 2; trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 15, effective July 1, 1953.

454.155.
Effect of new trial on title to property sold under attachment or judgment.

The title of purchasers in good faith to any property sold under an attachment or judgment shall not be affected by a new trial allowed a defendant constructively summoned, except the title of property obtained by the plaintiff and not bought of him in good faith by others.

History.

C. C. 417: trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 16, effective July 1, 1953.

454.160.
Lien created only by attachment or judgment.

No lien on the property of a defendant constructively summoned shall be created otherwise than by an attachment, as is provided in KRS

425.301

to

425.316

, or by judgment; nor shall any person be restrained from paying or delivering any money or property in his hands belonging or due to such defendant, by notice indorsed on the summons, or otherwise than by attachment or judgment.

History.

C. C. 418: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1980, ch. 188, § 305, effective July 1, 1980.

454.165.
Personal judgment against defendant constructively summoned forbidden.

No personal judgment shall be rendered against a defendant constructively summoned, and who has not appeared in the action, except as provided in KRS

454.210

.

History.

C. C. 419: trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 17, effective July 1, 1953; 1968, ch. 46, § 6.

454.170.
Substitution of affirmation for oath.

An oath required by any statute derived from the former Civil Code, or by the Rules of Civil Procedure may be substituted by the affirmation of a person who is conscientiously opposed to taking an oath.

History.

C. C. 680: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.175.
Execution of new bond for defective one.

If a bond provided for by any statute derived from the former Civil Code, or by the Rules of Civil Procedure be adjudged to be defective, a new and sufficient one may be executed in such reasonable time as the court may fix, with the same effect as if originally executed.

History.

C. C. 682: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

454.180.
Officer may require affidavit of surety’s qualifications.

An officer whose duty it is to take a surety in any bond provided for by any statute derived from the former Civil Code, or by the Rules of Civil Procedure may require the person offered as surety to make affidavit of his qualifications, which affidavit may be made before such officer. The taking of such an affidavit shall not exempt the officer from any liability to which he might otherwise be subject for taking insufficient security.

History.

C. C. 683: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Fiduciary Bond (AOC 825), Form 233.04.

454.185.
Qualifications of sureties.

The surety in every bond provided for by any statute derived from the former Civil Code, or by the Rules of Civil Procedure must be a resident of this state, and be worth double the sum to be secured beyond the amount of his debts, and have property liable to execution in this state equal to the sum to be secured. If there be two (2) or more sureties in the same bond they must, in the aggregate, have the qualifications prescribed in this section.

History.

C. C. 684: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Fiduciary Bond (AOC 825), Form 233.04.

454.190.
Commonwealth may prosecute remedy without bond.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by law, no bond, obligation or security shall be required of the Commonwealth or any of its agencies or officers acting for or in behalf of the Commonwealth in order to prosecute any remedy in the courts of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 35, § 1.

454.210.
Personal jurisdiction of courts over nonresident — Process, how served — Fee — Venue.

As used in this section, “person” includes an individual, his executor, administrator, or other personal representative, or a corporation, partnership, association, or any other legal or commercial entity, who is a nonresident of this Commonwealth.

A court may exercise personal jurisdiction over a person who acts directly or by an agent, as to a claim arising from the person’s:

Transacting any business in this Commonwealth;

Contracting to supply services or goods in this Commonwealth;

Causing tortious injury by an act or omission in this Commonwealth;

Causing tortious injury in this Commonwealth by an act or omission outside this Commonwealth if he regularly does or solicits business, or engages in any other persistent course of conduct, or derives substantial revenue from goods used or consumed or services rendered in this Commonwealth, provided that the tortious injury occurring in this Commonwealth arises out of the doing or soliciting of business or a persistent course of conduct or derivation of substantial revenue within the Commonwealth;

Causing injury in this Commonwealth to any person by breach of warranty expressly or impliedly made in the sale of goods outside this Commonwealth when the seller knew such person would use, consume, or be affected by, the goods in this Commonwealth, if he also regularly does or solicits business, or engages in any other persistent course of conduct, or derives substantial revenue from goods used or consumed or services rendered in this Commonwealth;

Having an interest in, using, or possessing real property in this Commonwealth, providing the claim arises from the interest in, use of, or possession of the real property, provided, however, that such in personam jurisdiction shall not be imposed on a nonresident who did not himself voluntarily institute the relationship, and did not knowingly perform, or fail to perform, the act or acts upon which jurisdiction is predicated;

Contracting to insure any person, property, or risk located within this Commonwealth at the time of contracting;

Committing sexual intercourse in this state which intercourse causes the birth of a child when:

The father or mother or both are domiciled in this state;

There is a repeated pattern of intercourse between the father and mother in this state; or

Said intercourse is a tort or a crime in this state; or

Making a telephone solicitation, as defined in KRS

367.46951

, or a charitable solicitation as defined in KRS

367.650

via telecommunication, into the Commonwealth.

When jurisdiction over a person is based solely upon this section, only a claim arising from acts enumerated in this section may be asserted against him.

When personal jurisdiction is authorized by this section, service of process may be made:

In any manner authorized by the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure;

On such person, or any agent of such person, in any county in this Commonwealth, where he may be found; or

On the Secretary of State who, for this purpose, shall be deemed to be the statutory agent of such person.

The clerk of the court in which the action is brought shall issue a summons against the defendant named in the complaint. The clerk shall execute the summons either by:

Sending by certified mail two (2) true copies to the Secretary of State and shall also mail with the summons two (2) attested copies of plaintiff’s complaint; or

Transmitting an electronically attested copy of the complaint and summons to the Secretary of State via the Kentucky Court of Justice electronic filing system.

The Secretary of State shall, within seven (7) days of receipt thereof in his office, mail a copy of the summons and complaint to the defendant at the address given in the complaint. The letter shall be posted by certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall bear the return address of the Secretary of State. The clerk shall make the usual return to the court, and in addition the Secretary of State shall make a return to the court showing that the acts contemplated by this statute have been performed, and shall attach to his return the registry receipt, if any. Summons shall be deemed to be served on the return of the Secretary of State and the action shall proceed as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The clerk mailing the summons to the Secretary of State shall mail to him, at the same time, a fee of ten dollars ($10), which shall be taxed as costs in the action. The fee for a summons transmitted electronically pursuant to this subsection shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State on a periodic basis.

When the exercise of personal jurisdiction is authorized by this section, any action or suit may be brought in the county wherein the plaintiff resides or where the cause of action or any part thereof arose.

A court of this Commonwealth may exercise jurisdiction on any other basis authorized in the Kentucky Revised Statutes or by the Rules of Civil Procedure, notwithstanding this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 46, §§ 1 to 5; 1972, ch. 307, § 3; 1974, ch. 315, § 87; 1976, ch. 27, § 20; 1978, ch. 402, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 107, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 136, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 159, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 204, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 185, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 21, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 16, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 105, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). This statute was amended by 2019 Ky. Acts chs. 16 and 105, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

454.220.
Personal jurisdiction of courts over nonresidents in certain domestic relations matters.

A court in any matrimonial action or family court proceeding involving a demand for support, alimony, maintenance, distributive awards, or special relief in matrimonial actions may exercise personal jurisdiction over the respondent or defendant notwithstanding the fact that he or she no longer is a resident or domiciliary of this state, or over his or her executor or administrator, if the party seeking support is a resident of or domiciled in this state at the time the demand is made, if this state was the matrimonial domicile of the parties before their separation; the defendant abandoned the plaintiff in this state; or the claim for support, alimony, maintenance, distributive awards, or special relief in matrimonial actions accrued under the laws of this state. The action shall be filed within one (1) year of the date the respondent or defendant became a nonresident of, or moved his domicile from, this state. Service of process may be made by personal service if the defendant or respondent is found within the state or by service through the use of KRS 454.210(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 169, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

454.260.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

454.260

to

454.270

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Vessel” means to include all navigable structures intended for commercial or pleasure transportation or any type of boating upon any river, lake, stream or body of water in the State of Kentucky. Said definition is to be interpreted liberally.

“Boat” means to include all navigable structures intended for commercial or pleasure transportation or any type of boating upon any river, lake, stream or body of water in the State of Kentucky. Said definition is to be interpreted liberally.

“Water craft” means to include all navigable structures intended for commercial or pleasure transportation or any type of boating upon any river, lake, stream or body of water in the State of Kentucky. Said definition is to be interpreted liberally.

“Nonresident” means any person who does not live and reside in the State of Kentucky or any business or corporation which does not have the home office or principal place of business in the State of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 183, § 3.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Philipps, The Kentucky Long Arm Statute: How “Long” Is It?, 4 N. Ky. L. Rev. 65 (1977).

454.265.
Citation — Purposes.

KRS

454.260

to

454.270

may be cited as the Nonresident Boating Act.

In enacting KRS

454.260

to

454.270

, it is the intention of the General Assembly to prevent a nonresident using the waters of the State of Kentucky and as a direct and proximate result of said use, causing any injury to any person or property and creating a situation where it is difficult or inconvenient to obtain service of process by virtue of any claim arising therefrom.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 183, §§ 1, 2.

454.270.
Appointment of Secretary of State as agent for service of process — Service of process — Return — Applicability.

Any nonresident operator or owner of any watercraft who accepts the privilege extended by the laws of this state to nonresidents to operate watercraft or have them operated within state shall, by such acceptance and by the operation of such watercraft within this state, make the Secretary of State the agent of himself or his personal representative for the service of process in any civil action instituted in the courts of this state against the operator or owner, or the personal representative of the operator or owner, arising out of or by reason of any accident or collision or damage occurring within this state in which the watercraft is involved.

The clerk of the court in which the action is brought shall issue a summons against the defendant named in the complaint and direct it to the sheriff of Franklin County. The sheriff shall execute the summons by delivering two (2) true copies to the Secretary of State and shall also deliver with each summons an attested copy of plaintiff’s complaint. The Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the summons and complaint to the defendant at the address given in the complaint. The letter shall be posted by prepaid certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall bear the return address of the Secretary of State. The sheriff shall make the usual return to the court, and in addition the Secretary of State shall make a return to the court showing that the acts contemplated by this statute have been performed, and shall attach to his return the registry receipt, if any. Summons shall be deemed to be served on the return of the Secretary of State and the action shall proceed as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The sheriff serving the summons upon the Secretary of State shall pay to him, at the time of service, a fee of ten dollars ($10), which shall be taxed as costs in the action. The Secretary shall keep a record of each summons, including the day and hour of service upon him.

The court in which the action is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to appear and defend the action.

This chapter extends the right of service of process upon nonresidents, and does not limit any other provisions for the service of process.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to any operator or owner of any watercraft who is a resident of this state at the time any accident or collision or damage occurs and who thereafter becomes a nonresident.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 183, § 4; 1972, ch. 307, § 2; 1974, ch. 315, § 88; 1980, ch. 114, § 108, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 204, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 185, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Fortune, Venue of Civil Actions in Kentucky, 60 Ky. L.J. 497 (1971).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Philipps, The Kentucky Long Arm Statute: How “Long” Is It?, 4 N. Ky. L. Rev. 65 (1977).

454.275.
Personal service on person whose marital domicile is in Kentucky.

A court may exercise personal jurisdiction over a person whose marital domicile is in Kentucky, and who, for the purpose of avoiding support and maintenance of his minor children, removes himself from the jurisdiction of the court. In such cases service may be had as provided in KRS

454.210

and

454.270

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 307, § 4.

454.280.
Individuals who can and cannot take depositions — Penalty.

Depositions taken in the Commonwealth that are to be used in its courts shall be taken before:

A hearing examiner;

A judge, clerk, commissioner, or official reporter of a court;

A notary public; or

Before other persons and under other circumstances authorized by law.

A deposition shall not be taken by a person who is:

A party to the action;

A relative, employee, or attorney of one (1) of the parties;

Someone with a financial interest in the action or its outcome; or

A relative, employee, or attorney of someone with a financial interest in the action or its outcome. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “employee” or “relative” shall not include an employee or relative of the attorney of one (1) of the parties.

For the purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection, “employee” includes a person who has a contractual relationship with a person or entity interested in the outcome of the litigation, including anyone who may ultimately be responsible for payment to provide reporting or other court services, and a person who is employed part-time or full-time under contract or otherwise by a person who has a contractual relationship with a party to provide reporting or other court services.

If a deposition is taken by a person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, then that deposition shall be void.

The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to contracts for court reporting services for the courts, agencies, or instrumentalities of the United States or the Commonwealth.

Any person who takes a deposition in violation of subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 224, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

454.350.
Time within which judge, commissioner or hearing officer must issue judgment or report — Certification of reason when delay occurs.

Every Circuit and District Judge shall, when at all possible, issue a written judgment or order in all civil actions which have been submitted for final adjudication within ninety (90) days from the date the action was taken under submission.

Where a report, findings, or recommendations of a commissioner or hearing officer are required by statute or rule as a prerequisite to an order or judgment by the Circuit or District Court the same shall be filed within ninety (90) days of the conclusion of the trial or hearing at which the commissioner or hearing officer presided.

Every Circuit and District Judge shall at the end of every month certify in writing to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court all cases which have been submitted for final adjudication for longer than ninety (90) days and have not been adjudicated and certify in writing to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court the reason for the delay.

Any District or Circuit Judge who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section shall be subject to removal by the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 1.